Illinois, session 104th, SB4194.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as is necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity, for a grant to the Clean Energy Jobs and Justice 8Fund for costs associated with contingent and operational 9expenses. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112026.